Utah statutes.
17-18a-401.   Public prosecutor powers and duties.

An attorney who serves as a public prosecutor shall:

(1)  except for a prosecution undertaken by a city attorney under Section 10-3-928, conduct, on behalf of the state, all prosecutions for a public offense committed within a county or prosecution district;

(2)  conduct, on behalf of the county, all prosecutions for a public offense in violation of a county criminal ordinance; and

(3)  perform all other duties and responsibilities as required by law.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

